Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Registration; Accidents

§ 41-13-101.
Definitions; classification of motorboats.

As used in this act:

“Commission” means the Wyoming game and fish commission;

“Department” means the Wyoming game and fish department;

“Motorboat” means any watercraft propelled in any respect by propulsion machinery powered by an energy source other than human effort;

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use a watercraft;

“Owner” means a person having the property in or title to a motorboat excluding a lienholder or a lessee under a lease not intended as security;

“Safety equipment” includes personal flotation devices, towing and bailing devices, paddles, fire extinguishers and navigation lights, backfire flame arresters, whistles or other sound producing devices and ventilation systems;

“Watercraft” means any contrivance used or designed primarily for navigation on water;

“Waters of this state” means any waters within the jurisdiction of Wyoming;

“This act” means W.S.

41-13-101

through

41-13-220

.

Motorboats subject to the provisions of this act shall be divided into four (4) classes as follows:

Class A. Less than sixteen (16) feet in length;

Class B. Sixteen (16) feet or over and less than twenty-six (26) feet in length;

Class C. Twenty-six (26) feet or over and less than forty (40) feet in length;

Class D. Forty (40) feet or over.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.1; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 177, § 2; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to game and fish commission generally, see §§

23-1-201

through

23-1-303

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes and local ordinances governing personal watercraft use, 118 ALR 5th 347.

§ 41-13-102.
Motorboat certificate of number required.

Except as provided by W.S.

41-13-103

, all motorboats powered by propulsion machinery of any type and operated on the waters of this state shall be numbered.

No person shall operate nor shall the owner permit the operation of any motorboat unless:

The motorboat is numbered in accordance with this act, applicable federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state;

The certificate of number issued for the motorboat is in full force and effect; and

The identifying number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of the motorboat.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.2; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in (b)(i), see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-103.
Motorboats to be numbered; exempt motorboats.

A motorboat shall not be required to be numbered under this act [§§

41-13-101

through

41-13-220

] if it is:

Already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state. Provided, that such boat shall not have been within this state for a period in excess of ninety (90) consecutive days;

Presently numbered under the rules of the department until the present registration expires and provided further, that present coast guard numbers shall be specifically recognized for their duration or until the certificate expires, whichever is first;

A motorboat whose owner is the United States, a state or a subdivision thereof, but such ownership must be visibly evident;

A motorboat belonging to a class of boats which has been exempted from numbering by the department after said agency has found that the numbering of motorboats of such class will not materially aid in their identification; and, if an agency of the federal government has a numbering system applicable to the class of motorboats to which the motorboat in question belongs, after the department has further found that the motorboat would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to the federal law.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-13-104.
Application
for certificate; issuance of certificate and assignment of number;
conformity with federal numbering system; expiration and renewal of
certificate; transfer of ownership; duplicate certificate; manufacturer
and dealer certificates.

The owner of each motorboat requiring numbering by this state shall apply for a number with the department or any place selling game and fish licenses on forms approved by the department. The application shall be signed by the owner and accompanied by the fee required by W.S.

41-13-109

. At the time of application, the applicant shall also present proof in a form approved by the department of revenue that all sales or use tax due on the motorboat have been paid. Any person who knowingly presents a false or fraudulent statement of proof is subject to the provisions of W.S.

6-5-303

, in addition to any penalties and interest due for nonpayment of sales or use tax on the motorboat. Upon receipt of the application in approved form the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate of number stating the number awarded to the motorboat and the name and address of the owner. The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the bow of the motorboat the identification number in such manner as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the commission in order that it may be completely visible. The number shall be maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for inspection on the motorboat for which issued, wherever the motorboat is operated. If any motorboat is rented for less than one (1) day, the owner or his designee may retain the certificate of number on shore if the certificate is readily available for inspection.

The owner of any motorboat for which a current certificate of number has been issued pursuant to any federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state shall, if the motorboat remains in this state in excess of ninety (90) consecutive days and is operated on the waters of this state at any time during this ninety (90) day period, apply for a certificate of number in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

In the event that an agency of the United States government shall have in force an overall system of identification numbering for motorboats within the United States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this act by the department shall be in conformity therewith.

The department may award any certificate of number directly or through authorized agents. Numbers and certificates awarded by authorized agents in conformity with this act and with rules and regulations of the commission are valid as if awarded directly by the department.

All records of the department made or kept pursuant to this section shall be public records.

Each certificate of number issued under this act expires on December 31 of the last year of valid registration under the certificate unless sooner terminated or discontinued under this act. A duplicate number may be obtained by an owner upon application to the department, which may require payment of a fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00). Certificates of number may be renewed by the owner in the same manner provided under this act for obtaining initial certification.

The owner of any motorboat shall within fifteen (15) days notify the department if such motorboat is destroyed or abandoned, or if his address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate of number. In all such cases, the notice shall be accompanied by a surrender of the certificate of number. When the surrender of the certificate is by reason of the motorboat being destroyed or abandoned, the department shall cancel the certificate and enter such fact in its records. If the surrender is by reason of a change of address on the part of the owner, the new address shall be endorsed on the certificate and the latter returned to the owner.

The purchaser of a motorboat may operate the motorboat for thirty (30) calendar days from the date of purchase without a new certificate of number if upon demand by a person authorized to enforce this act, the new owner can furnish proof of ownership and the date the motorboat was acquired. Upon transfer of ownership of a motorboat, the current certificate of number may be transferred to the new owner upon application to the department. Application by the new owner shall include his name, address and the certificate of number of the motorboat, together with payment of the registration fee prescribed by W.S.

41-13-109

and presentation of proof of transfer. Upon receipt of application and fee, the department shall transfer the certificate of number issued for the motorboat to the new owner. Unless the application is made and fee paid within thirty (30) days, the motorboat is without certificate of number and no person shall operate the motorboat until a certificate is issued.

No number other than the number awarded to a motorboat or granted reciprocity pursuant to this act shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow of such motorboat.

If any certificate of number is lost, mutilated or becomes illegible, the owner of the motorboat for which the certificate was issued may obtain a duplicate certificate upon application to the department. The department may set and collect payment of a fee for a duplicate certificate not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

A person engaged in the manufacture or sale of motorboats may, upon application to the department in the manner and on forms prescribed by rule and regulation, obtain certificates of number for use in the testing or demonstrating of these motorboats. The fee for each registration under this subsection shall be thirty dollars ($30.00). The numbers assigned by certificates of number issued under this subsection shall be temporarily placed on the watercraft to be tested or demonstrated.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.4; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 177, § 2; 1994, ch. 78, § 1; 1996, ch. 67, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective Jan. 1, 2018, substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in (f) and (k); and in (m), substituted “thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-105.
Watercraft accidents or collisions; duty to render aid; reportable accidents; operators required to report; accident investigation; seizure of watercraft.

The operator of a watercraft involved in a collision, accident or other casualty, so far as he can do so without serious danger to his own watercraft, crew, passengers and guests, shall render to other persons affected by the collision, accident or other casualty such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident or other casualty. The operator shall give his name, address and identification of his watercraft to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident or other casualty.

If a collision, accident or other casualty involving a watercraft results in death or injury to a person requiring medical treatment beyond first aid, the disappearance of any person from the watercraft under circumstances which indicate the possibility of death or injury, or damage to property in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00), the watercraft operator shall immediately provide notice of the accident to any Wyoming law enforcement agency or peace officer of this state. For purposes of this section, accidents include capsizing, flooding, fire, explosion, disappearance of the watercraft other than by theft and all collision accidents involving other watercraft or fixed or floating objects.

The operator of any watercraft involved in a reportable watercraft accident as defined under subsection (b) of this section shall immediately provide notice of the accident to any Wyoming law enforcement agency or peace officer. If a watercraft operator is not able to provide notice under this subsection, another adult person on the watercraft at the time of the accident may provide the required notice. Notice under this subsection shall to the extent reasonably known, contain the following information:

For each watercraft involved in the accident, the identifying number assigned by the certificate of number issued to the watercraft;

The location, time and date of the accident;

The name, address and age of the operator of each watercraft involved in the accident;

If not operating the watercraft at the time of the accident, the name and address of the watercraft owner;

The name and address of any person injured, killed or missing as a result of the accident;

The nature and extent of each injury resulting from the accident;

A description of any property damage resulting from the accident;

The name and address of any passengers on the watercraft at the time of the accident.

In addition to subsection (c) of this section, the watercraft operator shall within ten (10) days after the date of the accident, file with the department a full description of the collision, accident or other casualty. The report required under this subsection shall be submitted on a boating accident report form approved by the department and obtained from the investigating law enforcement agency or peace officer. The department shall provide forms required under subsection (c) of this section and this subsection to the appropriate law enforcement agencies and peace officers. The report shall not be referred to in any way and shall not be used as evidence in any judicial proceeding.

If the cause of any reportable watercraft accident as defined under subsection (b) of this section cannot be immediately determined during the investigation of the accident by the appropriate peace officer or law enforcement agency and the watercraft is necessary for investigative purposes, the officer or agency may temporarily seize and hold any watercraft involved in the accident.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.5; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 41-13-106.
Accident report information to federal government.

Upon the request of an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the department pursuant to W.S.

41-13-105

shall be transmitted to the requesting official or agency.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.6; Laws 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 41-13-107.
Political subdivisions not to number watercraft.

This act governs the numbering and registration of watercraft on the waters of this state. All other political subdivisions of this state are expressly prohibited from numbering watercraft in any respect.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.7; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-108.
Publication and distribution of regulations.

A copy of the regulations adopted pursuant to this act, and of any amendments thereto, shall be published by the department in a convenient form and a copy shall be distributed with each registration.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.8; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-109.
Motorboat registration fee.

The nonrefundable and nontransferable registration fee for motorboats is:

Thirty dollars ($30.00) for one (1) year; or

Eighty dollars ($80.00) for three (3) years.

In addition to the fee under subsection (a) of this section, persons registering a motorboat in Wyoming may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities. Motorboat registration forms shall contain information about the voluntary fee under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.9; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1996, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 67, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “voluntary” following “pay a”; and substituted “two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount” for “one dollar ($1.00)” in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, effective Jan. 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “Thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “Fifteen dollars ($15.00)”; and in (a)(ii), substituted “eighty dollars ($80.00)” for “Forty dollars ($40.00).”

§ 41-13-110.
Disposition of registration fees.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, all registration fees received under this act shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the game and fish fund to be used for administration and enforcement of this act. The department may receive funds and property under federal assistance programs. Any monies in excess of administration and enforcement expenses shall be used to promote boating safety, boating safety education and for the construction of boating facilities for the general public.

All voluntary fees received under W.S. 41-13-109(b) shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the search and rescue account created by W.S. 19-13-301(a).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.10; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1996, ch. 48, § 1; 1998, ch. 99, § 2; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “voluntary” following “All” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in the first sentence, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-111.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

No person shall intentionally or knowingly deface, alter, remove or destroy a vessel hull identification number (HIN) or an engine or outboard motor serial number.

No person shall intentionally or knowingly provide false information in a report required pursuant to W.S. 41-13-105(c).

Any person who fails to register and affix an assigned registration number to a motorboat as required by this act, operates an unregistered or unnumbered motorboat unless authorized by this act or fails to report a watercraft accident as required by W.S.

41-13-105

is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each violation.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 151, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.11; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (c), see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).